Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.150

Garbage—Lien—Priority.

The garbage collection and disposal service lien shall be prior to all liens and encumbrances filed subsequent to the filing of the notice of it with the county auditor, except the lien of general taxes and local improvement assessments whether levied prior or subsequent thereto.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.150. Prior: 1943 c 270 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9504-1, part.]